Utah statutes.
17-16-14.   Salaries of county officers.

The annual salaries of the officers of all counties in the state shall be fixed by the respective county  legislative bodies, provided no changes shall be made in existing salaries of county officers until the county legislative body in a county desiring to change existing salaries of county officers shall first hold a public hearing at which all interested persons shall be given an opportunity to be heard.



Amended by Chapter 227, 1993 General Session

